Illinois, session 104th, HB2802.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 510-19.05 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/10-19.05)7    Sec. 10-19.05. Daily pupil attendance calculation.8    (a) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, for a 9pupil of legal school age and in kindergarten or any of grades 101 through 12, a day of attendance shall be counted only for 11sessions of not less than 5 clock hours of school work per day 12under direct supervision of (i) teachers or (ii) non-teaching 13personnel or volunteer personnel when engaging in non-teaching 14duties and supervising in those instances specified in 15subsection (a) of Section 10-22.34 and paragraph 10 of Section 1634-18. Days of attendance by pupils through verified 17participation in an e-learning program adopted by a school 18board and verified by the regional office of education or 19intermediate service center for the school district under 20Section 10-20.56 of this Code shall be considered as full days 21of attendance under this Section.22    (b) A pupil regularly enrolled in a public school for only 23a part of the school day may be counted on the basis of   HB2802 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 08195 LNS 18245 b1one-sixth of a school day for every class hour of instruction 2of 40 minutes or more attended pursuant to such enrollment, 3unless a pupil is enrolled in a block-schedule format of 80 4minutes or more of instruction, in which case the pupil may be 5counted on the basis of the proportion of minutes of school 6work completed each day to the minimum number of minutes that 7school work is required to be held that day.8    (c) A session of 4 or more clock hours may be counted as a 9day of attendance upon certification by the regional 10superintendent of schools and approval by the State 11Superintendent of Education to the extent that the district 12has been forced to use daily multiple sessions.13    (d) A session of 3 or more clock hours may be counted as a 14day of attendance (1) when the remainder of the school day or 15at least 2 hours in the evening of that day is utilized for an 16in-service training program for teachers, up to a maximum of 1710 days per school year, provided that a district conducts an 18in-service training program for teachers in accordance with 19Section 10-22.39 of this Code, or, in lieu of 4 such days, 2 20full days may be used, in which event each such day may be 21counted as a day required for a legal school calendar pursuant 22to Section 10-19 of this Code; (2) when, of the 5 days allowed 23under item (1), a maximum of 4 days are used for parent-teacher 24conferences, or, in lieu of 4 such days, 2 full days are used, 25in which case each such day may be counted as a calendar day 26required under Section 10-19 of this Code, provided that the   HB2802 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 08195 LNS 18245 b1full-day, parent-teacher conference consists of (i) a minimum 2of 5 clock hours of parent-teacher conferences, (ii) both a 3minimum of 2 clock hours of parent-teacher conferences held in 4the evening following a full day of student attendance and a 5minimum of 3 clock hours of parent-teacher conferences held on 6the day immediately following evening parent-teacher 7conferences, or (iii) multiple parent-teacher conferences held 8in the evenings following full days of student attendance in 9which the time used for the parent-teacher conferences is 10equivalent to a minimum of 5 clock hours; and (3) when days in 11addition to those provided in items (1) and (2) are scheduled 12by a school pursuant to its school improvement plan adopted 13under Article 34 or its revised or amended school improvement 14plan adopted under Article 2, provided that (i) such sessions 15of 3 or more clock hours are scheduled to occur at regular 16intervals, (ii) the remainder of the school days in which such 17sessions occur are utilized for in-service training programs 18or other staff development activities for teachers, and (iii) 19a sufficient number of minutes of school work under the direct 20supervision of teachers are added to the school days between 21such regularly scheduled sessions to accumulate not less than 22the number of minutes by which such sessions of 3 or more clock 23hours fall short of 5 clock hours. Days scheduled for 24in-service training programs, staff development activities, or 25parent-teacher conferences may be scheduled separately for 26different grade levels and different attendance centers of the   HB2802 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 08195 LNS 18245 b1district.2    (e) A session of not less than one clock hour of teaching 3hospitalized or homebound pupils on-site or by telephone to 4the classroom may be counted as a half day of attendance; 5however, these pupils must receive 4 or more clock hours of 6instruction to be counted for a full day of attendance.7    (f) A session of at least 4 clock hours may be counted as a 8day of attendance for first grade pupils and pupils in 9full-day kindergartens, and a session of 2 or more hours may be 10counted as a half day of attendance by pupils in kindergartens 11that provide only half days of attendance.12    (g) For children with disabilities who are below the age 13of 6 years and who cannot attend 2 or more clock hours because 14of their disability or immaturity, a session of not less than 15one clock hour may be counted as a half day of attendance; 16however, for such children whose educational needs require a 17session of 4 or more clock hours, a session of at least 4 clock 18hours may be counted as a full day of attendance.19    (h) A recognized kindergarten that provides for only a 20half day of attendance by each pupil shall not have more than 21one half day of attendance counted in any one day. However, 22kindergartens may count 2 and a half days of attendance in any 235 consecutive school days. When a pupil attends such a 24kindergarten for 2 half days on any one school day, the pupil 25shall have the following day as a day absent from school, 26unless the school district obtains permission in writing from   HB2802 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 08195 LNS 18245 b1the State Superintendent of Education. Attendance at 2kindergartens that provide for a full day of attendance by 3each pupil shall be counted the same as attendance by first 4grade pupils. Only the first year of attendance in one 5kindergarten shall be counted, except in the case of children 6who entered the kindergarten in their fifth year whose 7educational development requires a second year of kindergarten 8as determined under rules of the State Board of Education.9    (i) On the days when the State's final accountability 10assessment is administered under subsection (c) of Section 112-3.64a-5 of this Code, the day of attendance for a pupil whose 12school day must be shortened to accommodate required testing 13procedures may be less than 5 clock hours and shall be counted 14toward the 176 days of actual pupil attendance required under 15Section 10-19 of this Code, provided that a sufficient number 16of minutes of school work in excess of 5 clock hours are first 17completed on other school days to compensate for the loss of 18school work on the examination days.19    (j) Pupils enrolled in a remote educational program 20established under Section 10-29 of this Code may be counted on 21the basis of a one-fifth day of attendance for every clock hour 22of instruction attended in the remote educational program, 23provided that, in any month, the school district may not claim 24for a student enrolled in a remote educational program more 25days of attendance than the maximum number of days of 26attendance the district can claim (i) for students enrolled in   HB2802 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 08195 LNS 18245 b1a building holding year-round classes if the student is 2classified as participating in the remote educational program 3on a year-round schedule or (ii) for students enrolled in a 4building not holding year-round classes if the student is not 5classified as participating in the remote educational program 6on a year-round schedule. 7    (j-5) The clock hour requirements of subsections (a) 8through (j) of this Section do not apply if the Governor has 9declared a disaster due to a public health emergency pursuant 10to Section 7 of the Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act. 11The State Superintendent of Education may establish minimum 12clock hour requirements under Sections 10-30 and 34-18.66 if 13the Governor has declared a disaster due to a public health 14emergency pursuant to Section 7 of the Illinois Emergency 15Management Agency Act. 16    (k) Pupil participation in any of the following activities 17shall be counted toward the calculation of clock hours of 18school work per day:19        (1) Instruction in a college course in which a student 20    is dually enrolled for both high school credit and college 21    credit.22        (2) Participation in a Supervised Career Development 23    Experience, as defined in Section 10 of the Postsecondary 24    and Workforce Readiness Act, or any work-based learning 25    experience in which student participation and learning 26    outcomes are approved directed by an educator licensed   HB2802 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 08195 LNS 18245 b1    under Article 21B for assessment of competencies. 2    Participation in a work-based learning experience may 3    include, but is not limited to, scheduled events of local, 4    State, and national youth organizations, career and 5    technical education student organizations, FFA 6    associations, State FFA associations, the National FFA 7    Organization, and 4-H programs as part of organized 8    competitions, or exhibitions, or conferences. The student 9    and the student's parent or legal guardian shall be 10    responsible for obtaining assignments missed while the 11    student was participating in a Supervised Career 12    Development Experience or other work-based learning 13    experience pursuant to this paragraph (2) from the 14    student's teacher.15        (2.5) Participation in any work-based learning 16    experience, including supervised agricultural 17    experiences, in which student participation and learning 18    outcomes are approved by an educator who holds an Educator 19    License with Stipulations with a career and technical 20    educator endorsement and a work-based learning 21    designation, as required by rule. 22        (3) Participation in a youth apprenticeship, as 23    jointly defined in rules of the State Board of Education 24    and Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity, in 25    which student participation and outcomes are approved 26    directed by an educator licensed under Article 21B for   HB2802 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 08195 LNS 18245 b1    assessment of competencies. The student and the student's 2    parent or legal guardian shall be responsible for 3    obtaining assignments missed while the student was 4    participating in a youth apprenticeship pursuant to this 5    paragraph (3) from the student's teacher.6        (4) Participation in a blended learning program 7    approved by the school district in which course content, 8    student evaluation, and instructional methods are 9    supervised by an educator licensed under Article 21B.10    A student and the student's parent or legal guardian are 11responsible for obtaining coursework that is missed while the 12student participates in an activity pursuant to this 13subsection (k) from the student's teacher.14    School district attendance policies shall be updated, 15added to a district's student handbook, and publicly posted to 16reflect the activities allowed to be counted toward the 17calculation of clock hours of school work under this 18subsection (k) no later than the beginning of the 2026-2027 19school year. These policies shall include, at a minimum, an 20approval process for students to attend allowable activities 21under this subsection (k) and provisions for making up missed 22coursework that do not penalize a student. 23(Source: P.A. 103-560, eff. 1-1-24.)